Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202479-210
Compulsory attendance; rules and regulations.

The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out sections 79-201 to 79-209.

Laws 1951, c. 276, § 1, p. 928;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 247;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-216;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 14;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 16.
July 19, 2024
The fact that conduct is subject to the criminal penalties under these sections does not proscribe granting of injunctive relief. State ex rel. Douglas v. Bigelow, 214 Neb. 464, 334 N.W.2d 444 (1983).

The provision for penal sanctions in the event of violations of the various statutory provisions relating to compulsory education and operation of private, denominational, and parochial schools does not foreclose the possibility of injunctive relief. State ex rel. Douglas v. Faith Baptist Church of Louisville, 207 Neb. 802, 301 N.W.2d 571 (1981).

Subdivision (3)(a) of section 43-247 establishes the juvenile court's jurisdiction over a minor child, while section 79-201 and this section make the minor child's parents or legal guardians culpable for the child's truancy. The county attorney is free to decide whether to proceed utilizing the juvenile code or the compulsory education laws. In re Interest of Laticia S., 21 Neb. App. 921, 844 N.W.2d 841 (2014).